South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3411.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 2, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-2-150.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall accept bank statements and credit card statements as proof of receipt, proof of purchase, and proof of expense. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----